Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.100

Form of letters with will annexed.

Letters of administration with the will annexed shall be in substantially the same form as provided for letters testamentary.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.100. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 60; RRS s 1430; prior: Code 1881 s 1387; 1863 p 219 s 121.]